Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Tennessee Wars Commission

4-11-301. Creation.

There is hereby created the Tennessee wars commission, hereafter referred to as the “commission,” which shall coordinate planning, preservation and promotion of the structures, buildings, sites and battlefields of Tennessee associated with the French and Indian War, American Revolution, War of 1812, U.S.-Mexican War, and the War Between the States.

Acts 1994, ch. 824, § 1; 1998, ch. 844, § 1; T.C.A. §4-11-501.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5 of this chapter was transferred to part 3 of this chapter by the code commission in 2011.

The Tennessee wars commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

4-11-302. Powers and duties.

The commission shall:

Develop a plan regarding significant sites in Tennessee related to the French and Indian War, American Revolution, War of 1812, U.S.-Mexican War, and the War Between the States, hereafter referred to as the “wars.” The plan will provide incentives to local landowners and local governments to preserve and restore battlefields and historic sites related to the wars. Through cooperative agreements between local governments, landowners and the commission, such entities will work together to preserve and restore historic sites;

Preserve and conserve the legacy of the wars in the state of Tennessee;

Recognize important events and geographic locations in the conduct of the wars in the state of Tennessee;

Establish a geographic data base and an information system that can be used to locate, track, and cross-reference significant historical and cultural properties, structures and markers associated with the wars;

Acquire or provide funds for the acquisition of battlegrounds, cemeteries and other historic properties associated with the wars;

Expend funds received from state appropriations and other sources to make grants to municipalities, counties and nonprofit organizations for the purpose of maintaining and restoring existing memorials and cemeteries related to the wars;

Encourage the establishment of reference sections relating to the wars in high schools;

Ensure that all literature produced by the commission adequately reflects the role of African-Americans in the French and Indian War, American Revolution, War of 1812, U.S.-Mexican War, and contributions on both sides of the War Between the States; and

Ensure the opportunity for adequate participation in the activities of the commission by African-Americans.

In carrying out its purposes, the commission is authorized to:

Accept loans or grants, or both, of money, materials or property of any kind from the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof upon such terms and conditions as the United States or such agency or instrumentality may impose;

Receive and accept loans, gifts, grants, donations or contributions of property, facilities, or services, with or without consideration from any person, firm or corporation or from the state of Tennessee or any agency or instrumentality thereof or from any county, municipal corporation or local government or governing body; and

Hold, use, administer and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income, as gifts or as appropriations from the general assembly for any of the purposes of the commission.

Acts 1994, ch. 824, § 2; 1998, ch. 844, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. §4-11-502.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5 of this chapter was transferred to part 3 of this chapter by the code commission in 2011.

4-11-303. Composition.

The Tennessee historical commission established by §4-11-102, is designated to be the Tennessee wars commission.

Acts 1994, ch. 824, § 3; T.C.A. §4-11-503.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5 of this chapter was transferred to part 3 of this chapter by the code commission in 2011.

4-11-304. Acquisition of lands — Maintenance.

The commission may, with the consent of the owner, acquire by donation, purchase or exchange lands and interests in battlefields and memorials of the wars, together with lands and interests in lands necessary to provide adequate public access to the battlefields and memorials.

The commission may make funds available, subject to appropriations for such purposes, for the maintenance and protection of the battlefields and memorials that may be subject to agreements as provided in § 4-11-302.

Acts 1994, ch. 824, § 4; T.C.A. §4-11-504.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5 of this chapter was transferred to part 3 of this chapter by the code commission in 2011.

4-11-305. Compensation of members — Reports — Appropriations.

The members of the commission shall receive no salary but shall be reimbursed necessary travel and per diem expenses as prescribed in comprehensive travel regulations by the commissioner of finance and administration for employees of the state.

The commission shall file an annual report with the governor and the speakers of the respective bodies of the general assembly containing a summary of the accomplishments of the commission during the preceding year and the plans of the commission for the following year.

No state funds shall be expended for the purposes of the commission unless specifically appropriated by the general assembly.

Acts 1994, ch. 824, § 5; T.C.A. §4-11-505.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5 of this chapter was transferred to part 3 of this chapter by the code commission in 2011.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

4-11-306. Compliance with laws and regulations.

In the conduct of its affairs, the commission shall comply with all laws, policies and regulations applicable generally to state agencies, with specific reference made to the laws, policies and regulations applicable to the historical commission. Furthermore, all loans shall be subject to the approval of the state funding board and all land acquisitions and dispositions shall be subject to the approval of the state building commission.

Acts 1994, ch. 824, § 6; T.C.A. §4-11-506.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 5 of this chapter was transferred to part 3 of this chapter by the code commission in 2011.